Hawaii, session 2026, SB2890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Part V of Act 250, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, is amended by amending section 14, item B-19, to read as follows: "19.      HAWAII FOODBANK, INC. PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION[, AND EQUIPMENT] FOR [SOLAR PANEL INSTALLATION.] A NEW FACILITY.  THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING          LBR            800 C                 C" SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________